New York, session 2025-2026, A8421.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 7507 of the civil practice law and rules, as 2 amended by chapter 952 of the laws of 1981, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 § 7507. Award; form; time; delivery. (a) Except as provided in section 5 7508, the award shall be in writing, signed and affirmed by the arbitra- 6 tor making it within the time fixed by the agreement, or, if the time is 7 not fixed, within such time as the court orders. 8 (b) In an arbitration involving a consumer dispute, pursuant to 9 section three hundred ninety-nine-c of the general business law, or an 10 employment dispute between an employer and employee, as defined in 11 section three of the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 (29 U.S.C. § 203) 12 but who is neither an officer nor employed pursuant to an individual- 13 ized, mutually-negotiated employment contract, where arbitration was 14 held pursuant to a contract, expect where inconsistent with federal law, 15 the award shall state the issues in dispute and shall set forth an 16 explanation of the reasons for the award. Such award shall contain a 17 decision on all issues submitted to the arbitrator. The provisions of 18 this subdivision shall not apply to agreements negotiated with any labor 19 union through collective bargaining. 20 (c) The parties may in writing extend the time either before or after 21 its expiration. A party waives the objection that an award was not made 22 within the time required unless [he] such party notifies the arbitrator EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07518-02-6 A. 8421--A 2 1 in writing of [his] their objection prior to the delivery of the award 2 to [him] such party. 3 (d) The arbitrator shall deliver a copy of the award to each party in 4 the manner provided in the agreement, or, if no provision is so made, 5 personally or by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 7 it shall have become a law.